Georgia statutes. TITLE 13 Contracts
PART 5 Project Completion Incentives in Contracts

13-10-70.
Liquidated damages for late completion and incentives for early completion.

Public works construction contracts may include both liquidated damages provisions for late construction project completion and incentive provisions for early construction project completion when the project schedule is deemed to have value. The terms of the liquidated damages provisions and the incentive provisions shall be established in advance as a part of the construction contract and included within the terms of the bid or proposal.

History.
Code 1981, §13-10-70, enacted by Ga. L. 2013, p. 628, § 4/SB 179.